Idaho, session 2026, H0962.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 12, Title 72, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 72-1207, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
72-1207. IDAHO LAUNCH GRANT PROGRAM RETURN ON INVESTMENT ANALY-
SIS. (1) At least biennially, the legislative services office shall conduct
a return on investment analysis of the Idaho launch grant program estab-
lished in section 72-1205, Idaho Code, and student outcomes to:
(a) Determine the alignment of the program's in-demand careers with em-
ployer demand, postsecondary degree or certificate programs, and in-
dustry-valued credentials;
(b) Identify the program's eligible in-demand careers that are linked
to high-skill and higher-wage in-demand occupations;
(c) Evaluate student participation and outcomes, such as postsecondary
attainment, employment status, and wage earnings associated with eli-
gible coursework under the program as defined in section 72-1204, Idaho
Code;
(d) Provide information that can be used to improve the alignment and
quality of the program and increase access and successful outcomes for
all students; and
(e) Provide information about the availability, quality, and student
outcomes of the program and its eligible institutions under the program
as defined in section 72-1204, Idaho Code, to support students and fami-
lies in making informed decisions about educational options.
(2) The return on investment analysis of the Idaho launch grant program
provided for in this section shall be conducted in collaboration with the
Idaho workforce development council, all eligible institutions under the
program, representatives from business and industry, and any other appro-
priate stakeholders. These entities shall:
(a) Support the completion of a high-quality return on investment anal-
ysis of the program by timely collecting and providing data and infor-
mation in the manner specified by the legislative services office and in
accordance with state and federal law; and
(b) Support the implementation of recommendations resulting from the
return on investment analysis of the program, which may include align-


ment or revision of agency or entity policies, processes, and proce-
dures.
(3) The legislative services office, in consultation with the Idaho
workforce development council, all eligible institutions under the pro-
gram, representatives from business and industry, and any other appropriate
stakeholders, shall develop and publish a methodology to conduct the return
on investment analysis of the program and its outcomes. The methodology
shall use consistent data definitions, criteria, or thresholds across edu-
cation systems and program institutions, to the extent practicable.
(4) The return on investment analysis of the program shall include but
is not limited to an analysis of:
(a) Statewide and regional labor market information, including cur-
rent and projected economic, labor market, and wage data reflecting the
needs of the state, regional, and global economy and workforce that in-
cludes:
(i) Development of a methodology to classify occupations at the
statewide and regional levels based on measures of skill, demand,
wage, and growth; and
(ii) Identification of statewide and regional employment oppor-
tunities in high-demand, high-growth, and higher-wage occupa-
tions;
(b) Alignment of current program in-demand careers, eligible institu-
tions, and eligible coursework with statewide and regional employment
opportunities, including:
(i) Identification of eligible institutions and eligible course-
work under the program leading to high-skill, high-demand, high-
growth, and higher-wage occupations;
(ii) Identification of gaps in program offerings leading to high-
growth, high-demand, and higher-wage occupations;
(iii) Identification of in-demand careers, eligible institu-
tions, and eligible coursework under the program that do not lead
students to high-growth, high-demand, or higher-wage employment
opportunities;
(iv) Postsecondary certificate or degree programs offered; and
(v) Industry-valued credentials used by employers in the state in
hiring and promotion decisions;
(c) Experiences of participating students that can be disaggregated by
student demographics, eligible institutions, and eligible coursework
under the program and compared to experiences of nonparticipating stu-
dents, including but not limited to:
(i) Program eligible institution enrollment, progression, and
completion, including:
1. Programs offered by all public and private schools or
postsecondary institutions;
2. Student enrollment in each eligible coursework offered
by an eligible institution under the program;
3. Student course completion and credit attainment in each
eligible institution under the program;
4. Student completion of each eligible coursework under the
program; and


5. Unmet student demand for each eligible institution under
the program, including waiting lists and students not en-
rolled due to space constraints;
(ii) Industry-valued credentials, including:
1. Student enrollment in courses or institutions aligned
with each industry-valued credential;
2. Student participation, including attempts, in each in-
dustry-valued credential examination or assessment;
3. Student attainment of each industry-valued credential;
and
4. Student attainment of each industry-valued credential
that articulates to postsecondary credit;
(iii) Postsecondary credit attainment, including:
1. Postsecondary credits or hours earned as part of the pro-
gram; and
2. Postsecondary credits or hours earned outside of the pro-
gram; and
(iv) Work-based learning experiences, including:
1. The type of each work-based learning experience;
2. The characteristics of each work-based learning experi-
ence, including but not limited to the duration, whether it
was paid or unpaid, or whether it was for credit or no credit;
3. Placement information including industry code (the North
American industry classification system) and occupation
code (the standard industrial classification);
4. Pre-apprenticeship and youth apprenticeship program en-
rollment and progression; and
5. Apprenticeship program enrollment and progression; and
(d) Student outcomes that can be disaggregated by student demograph-
ics, eligible institutions, and eligible coursework under the program
compared to outcomes of students not participating in the program, in-
cluding:
(i) Enrollment and persistence data disaggregated by type of in-
stitution, including technical colleges, two (2) year colleges,
four (4) year colleges, or private providers, and by type of cul-
minating credential, including certificates or diplomas and asso-
ciate or bachelor's degrees, including:
1. Enrollment in a postsecondary program;
2. Postsecondary persistence, including credit or hour at-
tainment; and
3. Postsecondary degree or credential attainment; and
(ii) Employment outcomes, including:
1. Employment status, including full-time or part-time em-
ployment;
2. Employment field by industry code (the North American
industry classification system) and occupation code (the
standard industrial classification);
3. Wage earnings; and


4. Other indicators of quality that can be disaggregated by
student demographics, eligible institutions, and eligible
coursework, including educator workforce, including:
(A) Current educator qualifications, expertise, and
specialized knowledge;
(B) Opportunities for educators to learn new skills
valued by employers;
(C) Educator positions that are unfilled or filled
by instructors who do not have appropriate knowledge,
skills, or experience; and
(D) Total and per-student amount of program funding
allocated to each student and amount spent per student
and amount reverted.
(5) Using the findings from the return on investment analysis of the
Idaho launch grant program provided for in this section, the legislative
services office, in consultation with the Idaho workforce development coun-
cil, all eligible institutions under the program, representatives from
business and industry, and any other appropriate stakeholders, shall de-
velop recommendations to improve labor market alignment, quality, student
access and outcomes, and operational efficiencies of the program. These
recommendations shall include detailed information, including roles, re-
sponsibilities, action steps, and timelines to achieve state agency policy,
process, and resource allocation strategies that will:
(a) Increase the alignment between the program and the state's economy,
including:
(i) Offering new programs that lead to high-skill, high-demand,
high-growth, and higher-wage occupations but that are not offered
by eligible institutions under the program;
(ii) Phasing out program offerings that are not aligned with the
needs of employers or do not provide program participants with a
middle-wage or high-wage job; and
(iii) Requiring school districts and eligible institutions to
align offerings to ensure seamless pathways for students from
grades K-12 through postsecondary school;
(b) Identify and address gaps between student groups in access, partic-
ipation, and successful outcomes through the program;
(c) Identify policies, processes, legal and resource barriers, or
other barriers that prevent students from accessing or succeeding in
eligible institutions and eligible coursework under the program, along
with detailed recommendations for the agency or stakeholder responsi-
ble for removing these barriers; and
(d) Identify and develop a plan and timeline to collect data elements
needed for a complete and high-quality return on investment analysis of
the program that are not currently available or accessible.
(6) By December 31, the legislative services office shall submit to
the governor, the president pro tempore of the senate, and the speaker of
the house of representatives a summary report and publicly post such report
on the Idaho legislature's website and the workforce development council's
website. The summary report shall contain detailed supporting data, includ-
ing, at a minimum:


(a) The findings of the return on investment analysis of the program
broken down by student demographics, eligible institution, and in-de-
mand career;
(b) The recommendations to improve labor market alignment, quality,
student access and outcomes, and operational efficiencies across the
eligible institutions and eligible coursework under the program;
(c) A list of existing eligible institutions and eligible coursework
under the program that are not aligned to employer demand or do not pre-
pare students for a middle-wage or high-wage job;
(d) A list of in-demand knowledge, skills, and competencies from em-
ployers that are currently not being met through existing eligible in-
stitutions and eligible coursework under the program; and
(e) Beginning with the second return on investment analysis of the pro-
gram, an update on the implementation status, activities, and outcomes
stemming from the prior report's recommendations.
(7) Following the release of the summary report, the legislative ser-
vices office and collaborating agencies shall publicly present the findings
and seek feedback from stakeholders across the state to inform future itera-
tions of the return on investment analysis of the program under this section.
Stakeholder engagement and feedback shall not be prevented throughout the
return on investment analysis of the program process.
(8) By January 1, the legislative services office shall provide com-
plete, matched data sets used in the return on investment analysis of the
program to the Idaho workforce development council, all eligible institu-
tions under the program, representatives from business and industry, and any
other appropriate stakeholders. The data sets shall be provided in a manner
and format that:
(a) Supports continuous program improvement and robust feedback of el-
igible institutions and eligible coursework under the program;
(b) Allows for aggregated findings for each eligible institution and
eligible coursework under the program, including outcomes, to be re-
ported publicly to students, families, and community members; and
(c) Complies with all applicable state and federal laws.
SECTION 2. The provisions of Section 1 of this act shall be null, void,
and of no force and effect on and after July 1, 2029.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.